Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.536

[Art. 60] Initial action on the record.

After a trial by court martial the record shall be forwarded to the convening authority, as reviewing authority, and action thereon may be taken by the person who convened the court, a commissioned officer commanding for the time being, a successor in command, or by the governor.

[ 1963 c 220 s 62.]